Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 3. Application for License or Permit.

Sec. 04.11.260.
Application for new license or permit.

An applicant for a new license or permit shall file with the director a written application, signed and sworn to by the applicant, giving the applicant’s name and address. If the applicant is a corporation, the application shall be executed by the authorized officers of the corporation. If the applicant is a partnership, including a limited partnership, the application shall be executed by an authorized general partner. The application must include

the type of license or permit desired;

a description of the premises for which the license or permit is desired, giving the address by street and number, or other information, so that the location of the premises can be definitely determined;

the license fee;

the duration of the license or permit desired;

any other information required by the board.

A corporation applying for a license or permit shall provide the names and addresses of the president, vice-president, secretary, managing officer, and all stockholders who own 10 percent or more of the stock in the corporation, together with any other information required by the board.

An applicant for a new license or permit must include with the application

proof that notice required by AS

04.11.310

has been given;

any petitions required to be secured under AS

04.11.460

before a license may be issued;

evidence of any approval by public authorities required to be obtained under AS

04.11.090(e)

,

04.11.220(c)

,

04.11.230(b)

,

04.11.240(b)

, or

04.11.250(b)

, before a license or permit may be issued.

A partnership, including a limited partnership, that applies for a license or permit shall provide information required by the board including the names and addresses of all general partners and all partners with an interest of 10 percent or more.

A limited liability organization that applies for a license or permit shall provide information required by the board, including the names and addresses of all members with an ownership interest of 10 percent or more and the names and addresses of all managers.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 6 ch 93 SLA 1985; am §§ 9, 10 ch 74 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For denial of new licenses and permits, see AS

04.11.320

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.260.
Application for new license, endorsement, or permit.

An applicant for a new license, endorsement, or permit shall file with the director a written application, signed and sworn to by the applicant, giving the applicant’s name, mailing address, telephone number, and electronic mail address. If the applicant is a corporation, the application shall be executed by an authorized officer of the corporation. If the applicant is a partnership, including a limited partnership, the application shall be executed by an authorized general partner. The application must include

the type of license, endorsement, or permit desired;

a description of the premises for which the license, endorsement, or permit is desired, giving the address by street and number, or other information, so that the location of the premises can be definitely determined;

an annotated illustration of the premises designating the areas for manufacture, storage, service, and consumption of alcoholic beverages and, for a license application, the area for warehousing of the alcoholic beverages;

the license, endorsement, or permit fee and, for a multiple fixed counter endorsement, the application fee for each counter;

the duration of the license, endorsement, or permit desired, including, for a permit, a statement of the event dates and the specific hours of intended operation;

any other information required by the board.

A corporation applying for a license or conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

shall provide the names and addresses of the president, vice- president, secretary, managing officer, and all stockholders who own 10 percent or more of the stock in the corporation, together with any other information required by the board.

An applicant for a new license or permit must include with the application

proof that notice required by AS

04.11.310

, if any, has been given;

any petitions required to be secured under AS

04.11.460

before a license may be issued;

evidence of any approval by public authorities required to be obtained before a license or permit may be issued, including

written approval under AS

04.09.240

from the governing body of a college or university for a pub license;

approval under AS

04.11.365

for a restaurant or eating place license in a multi-unit residential housing development owned or financed by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation;

permission from the commanding officer and the prime contractor for a conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

;

for a permit other than a conditional contractor’s permit, approval of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the site of the event for which the permit is sought.

A partnership, including a limited partnership, that applies for a license or conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

shall provide information required by the board including the names and addresses of all general partners and all partners with an interest of 10 percent or more.

A limited liability organization that applies for a license or conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

shall provide information required by the board, including the names and addresses of all members with an ownership interest of 10 percent or more and the names and addresses of all managers.

This section does not apply to a manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 6 ch 93 SLA 1985; am §§ 9, 10 ch 74 SLA 1999; am §§ 25, 26 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.270.
Application for renewal of license or permit.

An application for renewal of a license or renewal of a conditional contractor’s permit must include

the information required for a new license or permit under AS

04.11.260

except that proof of notice under AS

04.11.310

is not required; and

a list of all convictions of the applicant of violations of this title, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010

, that occurred in the preceding two calendar years.

A license shall be renewed as follows:

on or before November 1, the director shall mail a renewal application to each licensee whose license, unless renewed, will expire on December 31 of that year; the application shall be mailed to the licensee at the licensed premises or at a mailing address furnished by the licensee;

the licensee shall submit the completed renewal application and the biennial license fee to the director before January 1;

a renewal application filed after December 31 is delinquent and must be accompanied by a $500 penalty fee;

if December 31 falls on a weekend or a state holiday, the deadline is extended to the first business day following December 31.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 20, 21 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 11 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For denial of license or permit renewal, see AS

04.11.330

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.270.
Application for renewal of license, license with one or more endorsements, or conditional contractor’s permit.

An application for renewal of a license, license with one or more endorsements, or conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

must include

the information required for a new license, endorsement, or permit under AS

04.11.260

except that proof of notice under AS

04.11.310

is not required; and

a list of all convictions of the applicant of violations of this title, a regulation adopted under this title, or an ordinance adopted under AS

04.21.010

, that occurred in the preceding two calendar years.

A license, license with one or more endorsements, or permit shall be renewed as follows:

on or before November 1, the director shall mail a renewal application to each licensee whose license, license with one or more endorsements, or permit, unless renewed, will expire on December 31 of that year; the application shall be mailed to the licensee or permittee at a mailing address or electronic mail address furnished by the licensee or permittee;

the licensee or permittee shall submit the completed renewal application and the biennial fee to the director before January 1;

a renewal application filed after December 31 is delinquent and must be accompanied by a $500 penalty fee;

if December 31 falls on a weekend or a state holiday, the deadline is extended to the first business day following December 31.

This section does not apply to a manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 20, 21 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 11 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 27, 28 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.280.
Application for transfer of a license to another person.

An application for transfer of a license to another person must contain the same information about the transferee as is required of an applicant for a new license under AS

04.11.260

and must include other information required by the board.

An application for the transfer of a license to another person must be accompanied by a statement, under oath, executed by the transferor, listing all debts of the business and all taxes due by the business. The board shall promptly inform each listed creditor of the application and the amount shown as owed to that creditor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For board approval of transfers, see AS

04.11.040

; for denial of transfer of a license to another person, see AS

04.11.360

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.280.
Application for transfer of a license to another person.

An application for transfer of a license or a license with one or more endorsements to another person must contain the same information about the transferee as is required of an applicant for a new license or endorsement under AS

04.11.260

and must include other information required by the board.

An application for the transfer of a license or a license with one or more endorsements to another person must be accompanied by a statement, under oath, executed by the transferor, listing all debts of the business and all taxes due by the business. The board shall promptly inform each listed creditor of the application and the amount shown as owed to that creditor.

A license is automatically transferred as requested in an application for transfer of the license to another person if

the board does not approve or deny the completed application within 90 days after receiving the application;

the application is for transfer of a

restaurant or eating place license under AS

04.09.210

;

seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under AS

04.09.360

;

restaurant or eating place license under AS

04.09.210

with one or more endorsements; or

seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under AS

04.09.360

with one or more endorsements; and

the applicant for transfer of a license has not previously had a license or permit suspended or revoked under AS

04.11.370

.

The board may suspend or revoke a license that was automatically transferred to another person under (c) of this section if, after receiving criminal justice information and records obtained under AS

04.11.295

, the board determines that the licensee does not meet the qualifications for transfer of a license to another person under this title.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 29, 30 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.290.
Application for transfer of license location.

An application for a transfer of a license to a new location must contain the information required by the board and must be accompanied by proof that the notice required in AS

04.11.310

has been given and by any petitions required to be secured under AS

04.11.460

before a license may be transferred.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For board approval of transfers, see AS

04.11.040

; for denial of transfer of location, see AS

04.11.340

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.295.
Criminal justice information and records.

An applicant for the issuance or transfer of a license or a conditional contractor’s permit under this title shall submit to the board, with the application, the applicant’s fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check. Except as provided under (b) of this section, the board may require an applicant for renewal of a license or a conditional contractor’s permit under this title to submit fingerprints and pay the required fees. The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

. The Department of Public Safety may submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The board shall use the information obtained under this section in its determination of an applicant’s qualification for issuance, transfer, or renewal of a license or a conditional contractor’s permit.

For renewal of a license or conditional contractor’s permit held by a corporation that is required by federal law to file periodic reports with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, the board may require submission of fingerprints and payment of the required fees of not more than three individuals who are officers of the corporation.

In this section,

“applicant” means all individuals whose names and addresses are required to be provided with an application for a new license or permit under AS

04.11.260

;

“criminal justice information” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 79 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 59 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c); renumbered in 2018, at which time subsection (b) was relettered as (c) and a conforming change was made to (a).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, in (a), rewrote the second sentence, which read, “The board may require an applicant for renewal of a license or a conditional contractor's permit under this title to submit fingerprints and pay fees as required by this subsection.”; added (c) (now (b)).

Sec. 04.11.295.
Criminal justice information and records.

An applicant for the issuance or transfer of a license or issuance of a conditional contractor’s permit under this title shall submit to the board, with the application, the applicant’s fingerprints and the fees required by the Department of Public Safety under AS

12.62.160

for criminal justice information and a national criminal history record check. Except as provided under (b) of this section, the board may require an applicant for renewal of a license or a conditional contractor’s permit under this title to submit fingerprints and pay the required fees. The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety to obtain a report of criminal justice information under AS 12.62 and a national criminal history record check under AS

12.62.400

. The Department of Public Safety may submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The board shall use the information obtained under this section in its determination of an applicant’s qualification for issuance, transfer, or renewal of a license or issuance or renewal of a conditional contractor’s permit.

For renewal of a license or conditional contractor’s permit held by a corporation that is required by federal law to file periodic reports with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, the board may require submission of fingerprints and payment of the required fees of not more than three individuals who are officers of the corporation.

In this section,

“applicant” means all individuals whose names and addresses are required to be provided with an application for a new license or conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

;

“criminal justice information” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 63 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 79 SLA 2004; am §§ 3, 4 ch 59 SLA 2018; am §§ 31, 32 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.300.
State trooper investigation.

The state troopers shall assist the director in the investigation of applicants for new licenses and applicants for the transfer of existing licenses before the applications are considered by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.310.
Notice of application.

Before a new license is issued, or transfer of location or transfer of a license to another person is approved, the applicant must post a copy of the application for 10 days at the location of the proposed licensed premises and at any additional locations designated by the board. The board may require the applicant (1) to provide a copy of the application to newspapers, radio and television stations for public service announcement or (2) to provide paid notice of the application once each week for three successive weeks in a newspaper or by radio. The notice required in this subsection must be in more than one language when the board decides it is necessary.

Upon receipt of an application for the issuance, renewal, relocation, or transfer of ownership of a license for premises or proposed premises that are located within one-half mile of the boundary of a community council established by municipal charter or ordinance, the board shall

immediately provide written notice of the application to

the community council; and

any nonprofit community organization that has requested notification in writing; and

at least 10 days before the date set for board action on the application provide written notice of the proposed action and the time and place for a hearing to

the community council; and

any nonprofit community organization that has requested notification in writing.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

48 C.J.S., Intoxicating Liquors, § 152.

Sec. 04.11.310.
Notice of application.

Before a new license is issued, or transfer of location or transfer of a license to another person is approved, the applicant must post a copy of the application for 10 days at the location of the proposed licensed premises and at any additional locations designated by the board. The board may require the applicant (1) to provide a copy of the application to newspapers, radio and television stations for public service announcement or (2) to provide paid notice of the application once each week for three successive weeks in a newspaper or by radio. The notice required in this subsection must be in more than one language when the board decides it is necessary.

Upon receipt of an application for the issuance, renewal, relocation, or transfer of ownership of a license for premises or proposed premises that are located within one-half mile of the boundary of a community council established by municipal charter or ordinance, the board shall

immediately provide written notice of the application to

the community council; and

any nonprofit community organization that has requested notification in writing; and

at least 10 days before the date set for board action on the application provide written notice of the proposed action and the time and place for a hearing to

the community council; and

any nonprofit community organization that has requested notification in writing.

This section does not apply to a manufacturer direct shipment license issued under AS

04.09.370

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1988; am § 33 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.315.
False statement on application.

A person who knowingly makes a false sworn statement that the person does not believe to be true on an application under AS

04.11.260

—

04.11.310

commits the crime of perjury under AS

11.56.200

.

History.

(§ 34 ch 8 SLA 2022)